Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3

Competitive Cable and Video Services Act

7-59-301. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Competitive Cable and Video Services Act.”

Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 2.

7-59-302. Scope of part — Construction.

This part creates a fair franchising process for cable and video services and codifies the terms of the franchise in state law. This part does not alter existing state law regarding local control of public rights-of-way or the police powers of local government. This part does not alter or restrict the right of any municipality or county to impose ad valorem taxes, sales taxes, or other taxes of general applicability. This part does not alter or restrict in any manner the application of the Broadband Business Certainty Act of 2006, compiled in title 65, chapter 5, part 2. This part does not alter in any manner the provisions contained in chapter 52, part 6 of this title. This part does not alter or apply in any manner to wholesale telecommunications access by competitive local exchange carriers. It is the intent of this part to confer a limited role on the Tennessee public utility commission, referred to in this part as the “department”, which will be ministerial and narrowly construed, except to the extent otherwise specifically provided for in this part, and no rulemaking authority is provided by this part.

Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 3; 2017, ch. 94, § 16.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in the last sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

7-59-303. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Access” means that a provider is capable of providing cable service or video service at the household address regardless of whether any customer has ordered service or whether the owner or landlord or other responsible person has granted access to the household;

“Broadband Internet service” means an asymmetrical connection to the Internet from a home computer with an expected download data transfer rate of at least one and one half megabits per second (1.5 Mbps), or, after January 1, 2012, a data transfer rate equal to the speed that thirty percent (30%) or more of the provider's Internet service subscribers actually purchase, and shall not include direct-to-home satellite service or direct broadcast satellite service;

“Cable service” has the meaning set forth in 47 U.S.C. § 522(6); provided, however, that “cable service” does not include any video programming provided by a commercial mobile service provider as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 332(d) or video programming provided as part of, and via, a service that enables end users to access content, information, electronic mail or other services offered over the public Internet;

“Cable service provider” means a provider of cable service;

“Cable system” has the meaning set forth in 47 U.S.C. § 522(7);

“Days” means calendar days. For purposes of any act to be taken pursuant to this part, if an act is to be taken on a day that falls on a weekend or holiday, then the act shall be required on the next day that is not a weekend or holiday;

“Department” means the Tennessee public utility commission;

“Franchise” has the meaning set forth in 47 U.S.C. § 522(9), and additionally includes the authorization to construct and operate a cable or video service provider's facility within the public rights-of-way used to provide cable or video service;

“Franchise area” means, with respect to a large telecommunications provider that is a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, the aggregate geographic area containing its basic local exchange wire-line telephone service areas within the state. “Franchise area,” for all other holders of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, means the geographical area described in the application for a state-issued certificate of franchise authority within which a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority is seeking authority to deliver cable or video services;

“Franchise authority” means “franchising authority” as set forth in 47 U.S.C. § 522(10) or other governmental entity empowered by federal, state, or local law to grant a franchise. With regard to the holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority within the areas covered by the certificate, the department is the sole franchising authority. With respect to a franchise agreement with a municipality or county governing authority, that municipality or county is the sole franchising authority within the service area governed by that franchise agreement;

“Gross revenues” means:

With respect to a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, all revenues received from subscribers in the applicable municipality or unincorporated county area for providing cable or video services, and all revenues received from nonsubscribers in the applicable municipality or unincorporated county area for advertising services and as commissions from home shopping services, as allocated pursuant to subdivision (11)(B); provided, that the advertising or home shopping services are disseminated through cable or video services. Gross revenues shall be determined according to generally accepted accounting principles. “Gross revenues” does not include any:

Tax, surcharge, or governmental fee, including franchise fees; provided, however, that, upon the adoption of a resolution by the governing authority of the municipality or county, and notice of the resolution sent to the department, gross revenues may include the franchise fees; the governing authority of the municipality or county may likewise, by adopting a resolution, rescind such action;

Revenue not actually received, even if billed, such as bad debt;

Revenue received by any affiliate or any other person in exchange for supplying goods or services to the service provider;

Amounts attributable to refunds, rebates, or discounts;

Revenue from services provided over the cable system or video service system that are associated with or classified as non-cable or non-video services under federal law, including, but not limited to, revenues received from providing telecommunications services, information services other than cable or video services, Internet access services, directory or Internet advertising services, including, but not limited to, yellow pages, white pages, banner, and electronic publishing advertising. Where the sale of any such non-cable or non-video service is bundled with the sale of any cable or video service or services and sold for a single non-itemized price, the term “gross revenues” shall include only those revenues that are attributable to cable or video services based on the provider's books and records;

Revenue attributable to financial charges, such as returned check fees, late fees or interest;

Revenue from the sale or rental of property, except such property the consumer is required to buy or rent exclusively from the service provider;

Revenues from providing or maintaining an inside wiring plan;

Revenue from sales for resale with respect to which the purchaser is required to pay a franchise fee, and the purchaser certifies in writing that it will resell the service and pay a franchise fee with respect thereto; and

Amounts attributable to a reimbursement of costs, including, but not limited to, the reimbursements by programmers of marketing costs incurred for the promotion or introduction of video programming; and

With regard to gross revenues attributable to advertising revenues, or video home shopping services, the amount that is allocable to a municipality or unincorporated area of a county is equal to the total amount of a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority's revenue received from the advertising and home shopping services multiplied by the ratio of the number of the provider's subscribers located in the municipality or in the unincorporated area of the county to the total number of the provider's subscribers. The ratio shall be based on the number of the provider's subscribers as of January 1 of the preceding year or more current subscriber count at the provider's discretion, except that, in the first year in which services are provided, the ratio shall be computed as of the earliest practical date;

“Household” means an apartment, a house, a mobile home, or any other structure or part of a structure intended for residential occupancy as separate living quarters;

“Incumbent cable service provider” means any cable service provider who provided cable service in a municipality or in an unincorporated area of a county on July 1, 2008, under a franchise whether or not the franchise had expired on July 1, 2008;

“Large telecommunications provider” means a cable or video service provider using telecommunications facilities to provide cable or video service that, as of January 1, 2008, directly or through any subsidiary or affiliate, had more than one million (1,000,000) telecommunications access lines in this state. The basic local exchange footprint of a large telecommunications provider is that geographic area in which the carrier provides wire-line local telephone exchange service as of January 1, 2008;

“Low-income household” with respect to a large telecommunications provider means a household with an average annual income of less than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) as of July 1, 2008; provided, that, for determining low-income households, the most recent decennial census estimates of household income shall be adjusted by the consumer price index to estimate annual household incomes in prior years or subsequent years; provided further, that for determining low-income households after January 1, 2011, estimates from the most recent release of the American community survey five-year estimates shall be used. With respect to all other holders of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, “low-income household” means, at the option of the holder with respect to each franchise area, either:

A household meeting the standard provided in this subdivision (15) for large telecommunications providers; or

A household below the estimated median household income within the holder's franchise area according to the most recent decennial census estimates of household income or, to the extent available, more recent estimates from the small area income estimates provided by the United States census bureau or, after January 1, 2011, estimates from the most recent release of the American community survey five-year estimates for such areas;

“Public right-of-way” means the area on, along, below, or above a public roadway, highway, street, sidewalk, alley, bridge or waterway that is not private property;

“Qualified cable operator” means a cable service provider that, on the date that it applies for a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, individually or together with its affiliates or parent company, has at least seven hundred thousand (700,000) cable or video service customers in the United States as determined by data collected and reported by the federal communications commission, referred in this part as the FCC, or determined by information available to the public through a national trade association representing cable operators;

“Video programming” means programming provided by, or generally considered comparable to programming provided by a television broadcast station, as set forth in 47 U.S.C. § 522(20);

“Video service” means the provision of video programming through wireline facilities located, at least in part, in the public rights-of-way without regard to delivery technology, including Internet protocol technology or any other technology. “Video service” does not include any video programming provided by a commercial mobile service provider as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 332(d) or video programming provided as part of, and via, a service that enables end users to access content, information, electronic mail or other services offered over the public Internet. “Video service” does not include cable service; and

“Video service provider” means a provider of video service.

Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 4; 2010, ch. 961, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, § 17.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (7).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

7-59-304. Cable, video service or network facility — Certificate of franchise authority — Application — Transfer and termination.

Any entity, person or joint venture, as authorized under this part, seeking to provide cable or video service over a cable system or video service network facility in this state after July 1, 2008, at the discretion of the cable service provider or video service provider, may elect from among the franchise options as set forth in this section. A cable or video service provider shall not provide cable service or video service without a franchise obtained pursuant to this part, except as in accordance with § 7-59-102.

A person seeking to provide cable service or video service may elect to negotiate a local cable service or video service franchise agreement with a municipal or county franchise authority and may enter into a negotiated cable television franchise agreement in accordance with Title VI of the Communications Act of 1934 (47 U.S.C. § 521 et seq.), or a video service franchise agreement in accordance with any applicable state or federal law that establishes the terms and conditions for the franchise agreement within the jurisdictional limits of that municipality or county, including parts 1 and 2 of this chapter. A local cable service or video service franchise agreement entered into after July 1, 2008, shall remain in force and effect through its expiration date notwithstanding the provision for terminating a local franchise agreement established in subsection (b).

A person seeking to provide cable or video service, including any incumbent cable service provider, may elect to adopt the terms of a negotiated franchise agreement entered into between a cable service provider or video service provider and a municipal or county franchise authority in the service area in which the provider desires to provide service. The municipal or county franchise authority shall be required to enter into any such negotiated franchise agreement upon the same terms and conditions with any requesting provider of cable service or video service. A local cable service or video service franchise agreement that is adopted by a cable service provider or provider of video service after July 1, 2008, shall remain in force and effect through its expiration date notwithstanding the provision for terminating a local franchise agreement established in subsection (b).

A cable or video service provider may elect to file an application with the department for a state-issued certificate of franchise authority for one (1) or more specified service areas in accordance with the procedures set forth in this part.

The state-issued certificate of franchise authority issued by the department is fully transferable to any successor in interest in accordance with the requirements in this subdivision (a)(5). Notice of the transfer shall be provided to the department and to the governing authority of the affected local government at least ten (10) days prior to the consummation of the transaction. No later than forty-five (45) days following the consummation of the transaction, the transferor shall be required to pay any franchise fees or other amounts owed to any municipality or county. No later than ninety (90) days following the consummation of the transaction, the transferee shall apply to the department for a state-issued certificate of franchise authority. The transferee shall have interim authority to provide cable or video service pending the receipt of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority from the department. Notwithstanding this subdivision (a)(5)(A):

Subject to § 7-59-305(d), if the successor entity already holds a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, it may amend that certificate to add the transferred service area; and

Any intra-company transfer of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority may be accomplished by providing the notice described in subdivision (a)(5)(A).

Except to the extent permitted by applicable local permitting rules, transfer of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority does not transfer any interest or right under any local public permits for construction or work in public rights-of-way obtained by or in the name of the transferor and in no event shall a transfer of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority provide authority to a transferee to construct, maintain, or conduct any work in a public right-of-way until such time that the transferee obtains the required permits from, or is otherwise in compliance with the permitting requirements of, all applicable governmental authorities.

An incumbent cable service provider or an entity or person providing video service on July 1, 2008, under a franchise previously granted by a municipality or county may elect to terminate one (1) or more of its municipal or county franchises at its option and seek a state-issued certificate of franchise authority by filing an application for a state-issued certificate of franchise authority for one (1) or more specified service areas with the department in accordance with the procedures set forth in this part. The municipal or county franchise is terminated on the date the department issues the state-issued certificate of franchise authority and no provision of the terminated local franchise is enforceable thereafter, except that until the date upon which the local franchise would have naturally expired, an incumbent cable service provider or entity or person providing cable or video services under a local franchise agreement that is terminated pursuant to this part shall not reduce or otherwise diminish access to cable or video services of any subscriber as of the date of termination if the subscriber does not have access to cable or video services from another local franchise holder or a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority.

An incumbent cable service provider may elect to continue to operate under one (1) or more local franchises at its option and to apply to the department for a state-issued certificate of franchise authority to continue to operate with respect to one (1) or more other service areas not covered by the local franchises. Any incumbent cable service provider providing service under an expired local franchise, including a local franchise that expires at any time prior to July 1, 2008, shall follow the procedure set forth in § 7-59-307(a) to obtain either a local or state-issued certificate of franchise authority.

If an incumbent cable service provider or entity or person who chooses to terminate its local franchise agreement to obtain a state-issued certificate of franchise authority as provided in subdivision (b)(1) is providing to a municipality or county an institutional data network funded pursuant to the local franchise agreement, however defined or referenced in the local incumbent franchise, but generally including private line data network capacity for noncommercial purposes that is in existence as of January 1, 2008, and is funded via a line item per subscriber charge, then the incumbent cable service provider shall continue to provide the data network and a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority serving the municipality or county is required to remit to the affected municipality or county the same per subscriber charge collected by the incumbent cable provider until the natural termination date of the local franchise.

All cable and video service providers, including a holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority, may designate that portion of the subscriber's bill attributable to any payment required under this subdivision (b)(3) as a separate item on the bill for recovery of such amount from the subscriber. The fees shall be collected by the cable or video service provider or holder of a state-issued certificate of franchise authority and paid to the municipality or county. The municipality or county shall then remit or otherwise provide credit to the incumbent cable provider in a manner consistent with the local franchise agreement.

For any other institutional data networks in existence and provided by an incumbent cable provider on January 1, 2008, the incumbent cable provider shall continue to provide and fund the institutional network as set forth in its local franchise agreement and may petition the department for an order requiring all cable and video service providers and holders of state-issued certificates of franchise authority whose service area includes the affected municipality or county to contribute to the funding of the institutional network on a per subscriber basis in the municipality or county and to approve the appropriate per subscriber charge. To obtain such an order, the incumbent cable provider shall demonstrate to the department that it had the right to recover its costs on a per subscriber basis under its local franchise agreement and shall also demonstrate the reasonable recovery cost, consistent with its local franchise agreement and consistent with applicable federal law, relating to the institutional network. The department shall review and establish the accuracy of the information provided by the incumbent cable provider after notice and an opportunity for any provider or holder who may, under this subdivision (b)(4), be required to contribute, to challenge the information before the department.

Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 5.